Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.150

Penalty for failure to disclose unsatisfied lien, mortgage.

The delivery of livestock, for the purpose of sale, by any consignor or vendor to a public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale without making a full disclosure to the agent or licensee of such public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale of any unsatisfied lien or mortgage upon such livestock shall constitute a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1983 c 298 s 10; 1959 c 107 s 15.]